hu: LED jelzőfény színe: Kék; Zöld; Többszínű; Lila; Piros; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
nl: LED-indicator kleur: Blauw; Groen; Meerkleurig; Paars; Rood; Wit; Geel; Overig
da: LED-indikatorfarve: Blå; Grøn; Flerfarvet; Lilla; Rød; Hvid; Gul; Andet
sk-SK: Farba LED indikátora: Modrá; Zelená; Viacfarebná; Fialová; Červená; Biela; Žltá; Iné
ro-RO: Indicator LED colorat: Albastru; Verde; Multicolor; Mov; Roșu; Alb; Galben; Altele
es: Color del indicador LED: Azul; Verde; Multicolor; Morado; Rojo; Blanco; Amarillo; Otro
pl: Kolor wskaźnika LED: Niebieski; Zielony; Wielokolorowy; Fioletowy; Czerwony; Biały; Żółty; Inne
hr-HR: LED indikator boja: Plava; Zelena; Višebojna; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
zh-TW: LED 指示燈顏色: 藍色; 綠色; 多色; 紫色; 紅色; 白色; 黃色; 其他
de: Farbe der LED-Anzeige: Blau; Grün; Mehrfarbig; Lila; Rot; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstige
el: Ένδειξη χρώματος LED: Μπλε; Πράσινο; Πολύχρωμο; Μοβ; Κόκκινο; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
th: สีของไฟแสดงสถานะ LED: สีน้ำเงิน; สีเขียว; หลากหลายสี; สีม่วง; สีแดง; สีขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
fr: Couleur du voyant LED: Bleu; Vert; Multicolore; Violet; Rouge; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
sl-SI: Barva LED indikatorja: Modra; Zelena; Večbarvna; Vijolična; Rdeča; Bela; Rumena; Drugo
ja: LEDインジケーターの色: 青; 緑; マルチカラー; 紫; 赤; 白; 黄色; その他
pt-PT: Cor do indicador LED: Azul; Verde; Multicor; Roxo; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
it: Colore dell'indicatore LED: Blu; Verde; Multicolore; Viola; Rosso; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
ru: Цвет LED-индикатора: Синий; Зеленый; Многоцветный; Фиолетовый; Красный; Белый; Желтый; Другое
bg-BG: Цвят на LED индикатора: Син; Зелен; Многоцветен; Лилав; Червен; Бял; Жълт; Друг
cs: Barva LED indikátoru: Modrá; Zelená; Vícebarevná; Purpurová; Červená; Bílá; Žlutá; Jiné
lt-LT: LED indikatoriaus spalva: Mėlyna; Žalia; Įvairiaspalvė; Violetinė; Raudona; Balta; Geltona; Kita
zh-CN: LED 指示灯颜色: 蓝色; 绿色; 多色; 紫色; 红色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
vi: Màu đèn LED báo hiệu: màu xanh dương; màu xanh lá cây; Nhiều màu; màu tím; màu đỏ; màu trắng; màu vàng; Khác
pt-BR: Indicador LED cor: Azul; Verde; Multicolorido; Roxo; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
nb: Farge på LED-indikator: Blå; Grønn; Flerfarget; Lilla; Rød; Hvit; Gul; Annet
ko: LED 표시등 색상: 파란색; 녹색; 다색; 보라색; 빨간색; 흰색; 노란색; 기타
tr: LED gösterge rengi: Mavi; Yeşil; Çok renkli; Mor; Kırmızı; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
fi: LED-merkkivalon väri: Sininen; Vihreä; Monivärinen; Violetti; Punainen; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
sv: Färg på LED-indikator: Blå; Grön; Flerfärgad; Lila; Röd; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
en: LED indicator color: Blue; Green; Multicolor; Purple; Red; White; Yellow; Other